Maine, session 132, LD1980.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-I, sub-§74-M is enacted to read:
74-M.
Public Safety Law Enforcement Retention Advisory Not Authorized 25 MRSA
Council §3891
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §2842, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. Designation of status as first responder. A death certificate for an individual
must include whether the decedent had previously worked as a law enforcement officer,
firefighter or emergency medical care provider.
Sec. 3. 25 MRSA §2804-C, sub-§2-H is enacted to read:
2-H. Training regarding officer wellness. The board shall include in the basic law
enforcement training program an evidence-based block of instruction designed to prepare
officers for the psychological, emotional and physical stress associated with service as a
law enforcement officer. This training must be provided in person by a law enforcement
officer and a licensed mental health professional.
Sec. 4. 25 MRSA §2804-C, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2005, c. 331, §§22 and 23,
is further amended to read:
4. Courses. The board shall:
A. Provide a training course, the successful completion of which meets the basic
training requirements;
B. Provide a structured residential program that balances the goals of professional
policing with public services emphasis; and
C. Incorporate a community policing philosophy in its training program.; and
E. Incorporate critical incident debriefing in its training program to promote law
enforcement officer wellness.
Sec. 5. 25 MRSA c. 415 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 415
LAW ENFORCEMENT RETENTION ADVISORY COUNCIL
§3891. Law Enforcement Retention Advisory Council
1. Law Enforcement Retention Advisory Council; established. The Law
Enforcement Retention Advisory Council, as established by Title 5, section 12004-I,
subsection 74-M and referred to in this section as "the advisory council," shall advise the
Commissioner of Public Safety on the development and implementation of state and local
policies and programs for the purposes of improving the recruitment, retention and wellness
of law enforcement officers, as defined in Title 17-A, section 2, subsection 17.
Page 1 - 132LR2532(01)

2. Membership. The advisory council consists of the Commissioner of Public Safety
or the commissioner's designee and the following members appointed by the
commissioner:
A. An individual representing the Maine chapter of a national fraternal order of police;
B. An individual representing a statewide association of police;
C. An individual representing a statewide association advocating for law enforcement
officials within the Bureau of State Police;
D. An individual representing a statewide law enforcement association;
E. An individual representing the Maine Criminal Justice Academy;
F. An individual representing a coalition of mental health providers in the State who
specialize in treating first responders as the coalition's sole practice;
G. An individual representing a postsecondary educational institution in the State with
programs focused on law enforcement or mental health;
H. An individual representing a statewide association of chiefs of police;
I. An individual representing a statewide association of sheriffs;
J. A student representing a secondary school program focused on law enforcement
education in the State; and
K. An individual representing retired law enforcement officers in the State.
The advisory council may make recommendations to the Commissioner of Public
Safety and to any other organization or committee whose affairs pertain to public safety.
Sec. 6. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
Criminal Justice Academy 0290
Initiative: Provides funding for one MCJA Law Enforcement Wellness Coordinator
position and All Other costs.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $121,000 $125,356
All Other $5,000 $5,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $126,000 $130,356